Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB985.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 415.1(d) and (h), 431.2, 441(b)(2), (g) and (h) and 492(13) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, amended or added July 17, 2024 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 (P.L.924, No.86), are amended to read:Section 415.1. Ready-to-Drink Cocktail Permit.--* * *(d) A restaurant or hotel license holder that is also a ready-to-drink cocktail permit holder may sell for off-premises consumption, in a single transaction, up to one hundred ninety-two fluid ounces. Ounces of ready-to-drink cocktails shall not be combined with wine or malt or brewed beverages for the purpose of calculating the sale restrictions applicable to each of those beverages. A distributor or importing distributor license holder that is also a ready-to-drink cocktail permit holder may sell ready-to-drink cocktails in any quantity. [No ready-to-drink cocktail permit holder may sell ready-to-drink cocktails to a permit or license holder.] A distributor or importing distributor license holder that is also a ready-to-drink cocktail permit holder may sell ready-to-drink cocktails to ready-to-drink cocktail permit holders and licensees of the board.* * *(h) Holders of a ready-to-drink cocktail permit may also purchase ready-to-drink cocktails directly from a licensed Pennsylvania manufacturer [for the purpose of reselling the ready-to-drink cocktail for off-premises consumption.] or from a holder of a distributor or importing distributor license with a ready-to-drink cocktail permit.* * *Section 431.2. Authority to Acquire Ready-to-Drink Cocktail Permits.--The holder of a distributor or importing distributor license may acquire a ready-to-drink cocktail permit as set forth in section 415.1. The holder of a ready-to-drink cocktail permit may conduct tastings of ready-to-drink cocktails in 20250SB0985PN1130 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with the board's regulations pertaining to tastings for liquor. The ready-to-drink cocktails shall not be subject to the prohibitions set forth in section 492(13) and (14) which would otherwise prohibit distributors and importing distributors from selling, storing, possessing or interacting with liquor. The ready-to-drink cocktails shall be subject to section 431(b), (b.1), (c), (d) and (f).Section 441. Distributors' and Importing Distributors' Restrictions on Sales, Storage, Etc.--* * *(b) * * *(2) Distributors and importing distributors that hold a ready-to-drink cocktail permit shall be permitted to sell ready-to-drink cocktails in any quantity, and all sales must be in original containers. [Sales of ready-to-drink cocktails are limited to sales to nonlicensees, and sales of ready-to-drink cocktails for subsequent resale are prohibited.]* * *(g) All malt or brewed beverages and ready-to-drink cocktails purchased by an importing distributor from a Pennsylvania manufacturer of malt or brewed beverages or ready-to-drink cocktails or from any person located outside this Commonwealth for resale shall be invoiced to the importing distributor, shall come physically into the possession of such importing distributor and shall be unloaded into and distributed from the licensed premises of such importing distributor. The board may act to further define and control the storage and distribution of malt or brewed beverages and ready-to-drink cocktails in conformity with this section and this act.(h) As used in this section, the term "franchise territory" shall mean the geographically contiguous area in which an 20250SB0985PN1130 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 importing distributor has been given rights for the sale or resale of malt or brewed beverages and ready-to-drink cocktails.* * *Section 492. Unlawful Acts Relative to Malt or Brewed Beverages and Licensees.--It shall be unlawful--* * *(13) Possession or Storage of Liquor or Alcohol by Certain Licensees. For any distributor, importing distributor or retail dispenser, or his servants, agents or employes, to have in his possession, or to permit the storage of on the licensed premises or in any place contiguous or adjacent thereto accessible to the public or used in connection with the operation of the licensed premises, any alcohol or liquor. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the possession or storage of ready-to-drink cocktails that are purchased in compliance with [section 441] this act.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0985PN1130 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819